District of Columbia statutes.
4-1303.52

Panel membership.

(a)

The Panel shall be comprised of 15 members to be appointed as follows:

(1)

Eight members shall be appointed by the Mayor, and

(2)

Seven members shall be appointed by the Council by resolution.

(b)

(1)

Panel members shall be residents of the District.

(2)

None of the members shall be employed by the District government.

(3)

No more than 2 members appointed by the Mayor, and no more than 2 members appointed by the Council, shall serve as an officer, director, partner, employee, consultant, or contractor with an organization that provides services to the Agency.

(c)

In making their appointments, the Mayor and Council shall establish a Panel that is broadly representative of the community and includes members who have expertise in the prevention and treatment of child abuse and neglect. The Mayor and Council shall seek to include a diversity of professional backgrounds on the panel, such as children’s attorneys, child advocates, parents, foster parents, and other consumer representatives, social workers, educators, and health and mental health professionals who are familiar with the child welfare system.

(d)

The Mayor’s initial 8 appointments shall include 3 members appointed to 3-year terms that begin on April 12, 2005, 3 members appointed to 2-year terms that begin on April 12, 2005, and 2 members appointed to one year terms that begin on April 12, 2005. All subsequent appointments by the Mayor shall be for 3-year terms.

(e)

The Council’s initial 7 appointments shall include 3 members appointed to 3-year terms that begin on April 12, 2005, 2 members appointed to 2-year terms that begin on April 12, 2005, and 2 members appointed to one-year terms that begin on April 12, 2005. All subsequent appointments by the Council shall be for 3-year terms.

(f)

(1)

Vacancies in membership shall be filled in the same manner in which the original appointment was made, with the newly appointed member serving the unexpired term of his or her predecessor.

(2)

Members may be reappointed to the Panel.

(g)

The Mayor shall designate the Chairperson of the Panel and the Council shall designate the Vice Chairperson of the Panel.

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title IIIB, § 352
as added Apr. 12, 2005, D.C. Law 15-341, § 2(m), 52 DCR 2315